Maryland, session 2026, HB0679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–212.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CROSS–SEX HORMONE” MEANS A PRESCRIPTION HORMONE,
INCLUDING ESTROGEN AND TESTOSTERONE, OR HORMONE BLOCKER, INCLUDING A
TESTOSTERONE BLOCKER.
(3) “CROSS–SEX HORMONE THERAPY” MEANS A TREATMENT USED TO
DEVELOP SECONDARY SEX CHARACTERISTICS FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TRANSITIONING
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0679*

HOUSE BILL 679
FROM THE INDIVIDUAL’S ASSIGNED SEX AT BIRTH TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S
EXPERIENCED OR EXPRESSED GENDER.
(B) A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER LICENSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE MAY
NOT PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, OR ADMINISTER CROSS–SEX HORMONES OR OTHERWISE
PROVIDE CROSS–SEX HORMONE THERAPY FOR THE PURPOSES OF TREATING A
MENTAL HEALTH DIAGNOSIS ASSOCIATED WITH GENDER NONCONFORMITY,
INCLUDING GENDER DYSPHORIA, TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MINOR.
(C) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING LIFE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.